Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-9607
Death of patient; effect on debt.

If an eligible patient dies while being treated by an investigational drug, biological product, or device, the manufacturer may not seek reimbursement for any outstanding debt related to the treatment or lack of insurance due to the treatment from the eligible patient's or his or her caretaker's estate.

Laws 2018, LB117, § 7.
July 19, 2018